lt-LT: Suderinamas kryžminio siuvinėjimo audinio tankis: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (vienodo pynimo); 32 ct (linas / vienodo pynimo); 36 ct (linas / vienodo pynimo); Kita
fr: Nombre de fils de tissu compatible pour le point de croix: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (étamine); 32 ct (lin/étamine); 36 ct (lin/étamine); Autre
bg-BG: Съвместима гъстота на плат за кръстат бод: 11 каунта; 12 каунта; 14 каунта; 16 каунта; 18 каунта; 20 каунта; 22 каунта; 25 каунта; 28 каунта (evenweave); 32 каунта (лен/evenweave); 36 каунта (лен/evenweave); Друго
zh-CN: 推荐的十字绣布料支数: 11 CT; 12 CT; 14 CT; 16 CT; 18 CT; 20 CT; 22 CT; 25 CT; 28 CT（均匀布）; 32 CT（亚麻/均匀布）; 36 CT（亚麻/均匀布）; 其他
el: Συμβατά μέτρα υφάσματος για σταυροβελονιά: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (λινό/evenweave); 36 ct (λινό/evenweave); Άλλο
cs: Kompatibilní počet látek pro křížkový steh: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (len/evenweave); 36 ct (len/evenweave); Jiné
pt-PT: Contagem de tecido compatível para ponto cruz: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (fios regulares); 32 ct (linho/fios regulares); 36 ct (linho/fios regulares); Outra
it: Conteggio del tessuto per punto croce compatibile: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (trama regolare); 32 ct (lino/trama regolare); 36 ct (lino/trama regolare); Altro
th: จำนวนเส้นด้ายที่เหมาะสมกับงานปักครอสติช: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (ผ้าอีเวนวีฟ); 32 ct (ผ้าลินิน/ผ้าอีเวนวีฟ); 36 ct (ผ้าลินิน/ผ้าอีเวนวีฟ); อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Număr de materiale compatibile pentru cusături în cruce: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (in/evenweave); 36 ct (in/evenweave); Altele
sk-SK: Kompatibilný počet látok na krížikovú výšivku: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (ľan/evenweave); 36 ct (ľan/evenweave); Iné
nl: Compatibele kruissteek stofdraadtelling: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (aftelstof); 32 ct (linnen/aftelstof); 36 ct (linnen/aftelstof); Overig
sv: Kompatibelt trådtäthet för korsstygn: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (linne/evenweave); 36 ct (linne/evenweave); Annat
ru: Совместимый каунт ткани для вышивки крестом: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (равномерного переплетения); 32 ct (лён/равномерного переплетения); 36 ct (лён/равномерного переплетения); Другое
zh-TW: 相容的十字繡布目數: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (平紋布); 32 ct (亞麻布/平紋布); 36 ct (亞麻布/平紋布); 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilni broj tkanina za križni bod: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (ravnomjerno tkano); 32 ct (lan / ravnomjerno tkano); 36 ct (lan / ravnomjerno tkano); Ostalo
hu: Kompatibilis keresztszemes anyagmennyiség: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (egyenletes szövésű); 32 ct (vászon / egyenletes szövésű); 36 ct (vászon / egyenletes szövésű); Egyéb
ko: 호환 십자수 원단 카운트: 11ct; 12ct; 14ct; 16ct; 18ct; 20ct; 22ct; 25ct; 28ct(이븐위브); 32ct(리넨/이븐위브); 36ct(리넨/이븐위브); 기타
pl: Kompatybilna gęstość tkaniny do haftu krzyżykowego: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (len/evenweave); 36 ct (len/evenweave); Inne
de: Kompatible Kreuzstich-Stoffdichte: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (Zählstoff); 32 ct (Leinen/Zählstoff); 36 ct (Leinen/Zählstoff); Sonstige
nb: Kompatibelt antall korsstingsstoffer: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (jevnt vevd); 32 ct (lin / jevnt vevd); 36 ct (lin / jevnt vevd); Annet
ja: 互換性のあるクロスステッチ生地のカウント数: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (イーブンウィーブ); 32 ct (リネン / イーブンウィーブ); 36 ct (リネン / イーブンウィーブ); その他
tr: Uyumlu kanaviçe kumaş sayısı: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (keten/evenweave); 36 ct (keten/evenweave); Diğer
da: Kompatibel trådtæthed til korssting: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (hør/evenweave); 36 ct (hør/evenweave); Andet
vi: Số lượng vải thêu chữ thập tương thích: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (vải lanh/evenweave); 36 ct (vải lanh/evenweave); Khác
pt-BR: Número de pontos do tecido para ponto cruz compatível: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (etamine); 32 ct (linho/etamine); 36 ct (linho/etamine); Outro
fi: Yhteensopiva ristipistokankaan tiheys: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (tasasidoksinen); 32 ct (pellava/tasasidoksinen); 36 ct (pellava/tasasidoksinen); Muu
sl-SI: Številka blaga, združljivega s križnim vbodom: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (enakomerno tkana); 32 ct (lanena/enakomerno tkana); 36 ct (lanena/enakomerno tkana); Drugo
es: Compatibilidad con el recuento de la tela de punto de cruz: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (trama uniforme); 32 ct (lino/trama uniforme); 36 ct (lino/trama uniforme); Otro
en: Compatible cross stitch fabric count: 11 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 25 ct; 28 ct (evenweave); 32 ct (linen/evenweave); 36 ct (linen/evenweave); Other